Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.070

Probation and parole services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 72.01 RCW or any other provision of law, counties may engage in probation and parole services and employ personnel therefor under such terms and conditions as any such county shall so determine. If a county elects to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant offenders placed on probation under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the county may contract with other counties to receive or provide such probation services. A county may also enter into partnership agreements with the department of corrections under RCW 72.09.300.

[ 1996 c 298 s 7; 1967 c 200 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 c 200: See note following RCW 9.45.122.

Indeterminate sentences: Chapter 9.95 RCW.